Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.170

Prosecution—Enforcement by superior courts.

(1) Any prosecution brought under this chapter may be instituted in any county in which the defendant or any defendant resides, or in which the violation was committed, or in which the defendant or any defendant has his or her principal place of business.

(2) The superior courts may enforce this chapter and the rules and regulations of the commission issued hereunder, and may prevent and restrain violations thereof.

[ 2006 c 330 s 20.]